Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-732
Landowner; invitee; permittee; liability; limitation.

Subject to section 37-734, an owner of land who either directly or indirectly invites or permits without charge any person to use such property for recreational purposes does not thereby (1) extend any assurance that the premises are safe for any purpose, (2) confer upon such persons the legal status of an invitee or licensee to whom a duty of care is owed, or (3) assume responsibility for or incur liability for any injury to person or property caused by an act or omission of such persons.

Laws 1965, c. 193, § 3, p. 589;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1003;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 346.

Evidence required a finding that the entire area owned by the defendant was covered by act and had been made available, directly or indirectly, to the plaintiff. Gallagher v. Omaha Public Power Dist., 225 Neb. 354, 405 N.W.2d 571 (1987).

Recreation Liability Act is not limited to private persons; governmental subdivisions are "owners" within meaning of this section. Gallagher v. Omaha Public Power Dist., 225 Neb. 354, 405 N.W.2d 571 (1987).